Indiana, session 2026, SB123.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-34-3-28 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 28. (a) Each public school, including a charter school,
shall present an informational video on water safety each school
year to students enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12.
(b) The department shall approve an informational video on
water safety for use by public schools, including charter schools,
under subsection (a) for each group of the following grade levels:
(1) Kindergarten through grade 6.
(2) Grades 7 and 8.
(3) Grades 9 through 12.
(c) Each informational video on water safety approved under
subsection (b):
(1) may be developed by a nonprofit organization or
individual with a commitment to water safety and swimming
instruction; and
(2) shall include instruction on the following topics:
2026 IN 123—LS 6440/DI 152


(A) The flip, float, and follow method for water safety.
(B) Awareness of water conditions.
(C) Safe behaviors in and around the water.
(D) The importance of:
(i) pool barriers and fencing; and
(ii) formal swim lessons.
2026 IN 123—LS 6440/DI 152